dictsource/qso_rules
// This file is UTF-8 encoded
// translation rules for Solresol

.group do
         do       do

.group re
         re       re

.group mi
         mi       mi

.group fa
         fa       fa

.group sol
          sol     sol

.group la
         la       la

.group si
         si       si

.group
   dō      d''o:
   rē      r''e:
   mī      m''i:
   fā      f''a:
   sōl     s''o:l
   lā      l''a:
   sī      s''i:
